New York, session 2025-2026, S8307.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 99-aa to read as follows: 3 § 99-aa. In vessel composting. A municipality may adopt a local law 4 requiring the use of in vessel composting for the disposal of organic 5 waste that is generated from a residence. For the purposes of this 6 section, "in vessel composting" shall mean a process in which organic 7 waste is enclosed in a drum, silo, bin, tunnel, reactor, or other 8 container for the purpose of producing compost, maintained under 9 controlled conditions of temperature and moisture and where air-borne 10 emissions are controlled, and "organic waste" shall mean any material 11 found in the waste stream that can be broken down into, or otherwise 12 become part of, usable compost, such as food scraps, soiled paper, and 13 plant trimmings. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13235-01-5